New Jersey, session 222, S2297.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     A municipality may by ordinance provide that a construction permit shall not issue for any structure or building to be newly constructed within the municipality unless the structure or building is constructed without any natural gas connection. b.    An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall require a construction permit application for a new structure or building to contain plans for the structure or building to be powered by a source of energy other than natural gas. c.     The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to its rule-making authority under the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) in order to effectuate the purposes of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.